en: grapefruit juice
az: qreyfrut şirəsi
bg: сок от грейпфут
ca: suc d'aranja
cs: grapefruitová šťáva
da: grapefrugtsaft, grapefrugtjuice
de: Grapefruitsaft, Grape-fruitsaft, Pampelmussaft, Pampelmusensaft
el: χυμός γκρέιπφρουτ, χυμός γκρέιπ-φρούτ
eo: grapfrukta suko
es: zumo de pomelo, jugo de pomelo, zumo de toronja, jugo de toronja
et: greibimahl
fa: آب گریپ‌فروت
fi: greippimehu
fr: jus de pamplemousse
he: מיץ אשכוליות
hr: sok od grejpa
hu: grépfrútlé
hy: Թուրինջի հյութ
id: jus limau gedang
it: succo di pompelmo
ja: グレープフルーツジュース
kk: грейпфрут ширеси
ko: 그레이프프루트 주스
lt: greipfrutų sultys
lv: greipfrūtu sula
mt: ġulepp tat-tronġ
nl: grapefruitsap, pompelmoessap
pl: sok grejpfrutowy
pt: suco de toranja, sumo de toranja, suco de pamplumossa, sumo de pamplumossa
ro: suc de grepfrut
ru: грейпфрутовый сок
sk: grepová šťava
sl: sok grenivke, grenivkin sok
sv: grapefruktjuice
tt: грейпфрут суы
uk: грейпфрутовий сік
zh: 葡萄柚汁

en: concentrated grapefruit juice
it: succo di pompelmo concentrato

en: grapefruit juice based on concentrate
de: Grapefruitsaft aus Konzentrat, Grapefruitsaft aus Grapefruitsaftkonzentrat
fi: greippimehu tiivisteestä
fr: jus de pamplemousse à base de concentré
hr: sok od grejpa na bazi koncentrata
it: succo di pompelmo a base di concentrato
pl: sok grejpfrutowy z zagęszczonego soku grejpfrutowego

fr: écorces de pamplemousse
de: Grapefruitschale
nl: pompelmoesschillen

en: yellow grapefruit
fr: Pulpe de pomelo jaune cru, Pulpe de pamplemousse jaune cru
it: pompelmo giallo

en: pink grapefruit
bg: розов грейпфрут
de: Pink grapefruit
es: pomelo rosa
fi: verigreippi
fr: pamplemousse rose
hr: ružičasti grejp
it: pompelmo rosa

en: pink grapefruit juice
de: Pink grapefruit saft
es: Zumo de pomelo rosa, jugo de pomelo rosa
fi: verigreippimehu
fr: Jus de pamplemousse rose
hr: sok od ružičastog grejpa
it: succo di pompelmo rosa
nl: roze pompelmoessap
pl: sok z rózowego grejpfruta

en: pink grapefruit juice from concentrate
de: Pink grapefruit Saft aus Konzentrat
es: Zumo de pomelo rosa a partir de concentrado, jugo de pomelo rosa a partir de concentrado
fi: verigreippimehu tiivisteestä
fr: jus de pamplemousse rose à base de concentré
hr: sok od ružičastog grejpa iz koncentrata
it: succo di pompelmo rosa ricavata di concentrato
nl: roze pompelmoessap uit sapconcentraat

en: grapefruit syrup
de: Grapefruitsirup
fr: sirop de pamplemousse
hr: sirup od grejpa
it: sciroppo di pompelmo

en: pomelo, pummelo
ar: بومَلي
bg: помело
da: pomelo
de: Pomelo
el: φράπα
eo: Pumelo
et: pomel
fr: pomelo, pomelos
ga: pomaló
hr: grejpfrut
hu: pomelo
it: pomelo
la: Citrus ×paradisi × Citrus maxima
lt: didysis greipfrutas
nl: pomelo
pl: pomelo, pomarańcza olbrzymia
pt: pomelo
ru: помело
sk: pumelo, pomelo
sl: pomelo
sv: Pomelo, honungspomelo
tt: Bali limunē

en: Corsican pomelo
de: korsischer Pomelo
es: pomelo corso
fr: pomelo de corse
hr: korzikanski pomelo
it: pomelo corso
nl: Corsicaanse pomelo

en: red pomelo
de: roter Pomelo
es: pomelo rojo
fr: pomelo rouge
hr: crveni pomelo
it: pomelo rosso
nl: rode pomelo

en: star ruby pomelo, star ruby
it: pompelmo rubino stellato

en: pomelo juice
fr: jus de pomelo

fr: extrait naturel de pomelo
de: natürlicher Grapefruitsaft
es: extracto natural de pomelo
it: estratto naturale di pompelmo
nl: natuurlijk grapefruitsap

en: pomelo juice from concentrate
fr: jus de pomelo à base de concentré
it: succo di pomelo da concentrato

en: french pomelo juice from concentrate
fr: jus de pomelo de France à base de concentré
it: succo di pompelmo francese da concentrato

en: grapefruit or pomelo
es: pomelo
it: pompelmo o pomelo

en: grapefruit or pomelo juice from concentrate
es: zumo de pomelo a partir de concentrado, jugo de pomelo a partir de concentrado
it: succo di pompelmo o di pomelo da concentrato

en: kaffir lime
bn: কাফির লেবু
de: Kaffernlimette, Kaffernlimetten, Kaffirlimette
es: lima kaffir
fa: لیموی کفیر
fi: ryppylimetti, kafferilimetti, kaffirlime
fr: combava, lime kaffir
hr: kaffir limeta
id: Jeruk purut
it: limone kaffir
ja: コブミカン
jv: Jeruk purut
ko: 카피르라임
kv: Кафир-лайм
la: Citrus hystrix
lo: ໝາກຂີ້ຫູດ
ms: Limau purut
my: တောရှောက်ခါး
nb: Kaffirlime
nl: Kafferlimoen
pl: limonka kaffir, Papeda, limonki kaffir, kaffir
pt: Combava
ru: Кафир-лайм
sl: Kombava
su: Jeruk purut
sv: kaffirlime, kaffir lime
th: มะกรูด
ud: Кафир-лайм
vi: Trấp
zh: 箭叶橙